Maryland, session 2026, HB0225.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Agriculture
2–703.
There is a Maryland Horse Industry Board.
2–719.
Subject to the evaluation and reestablishment provisions of the Program Evaluation
Act, the provisions of this subtitle and of any rule or regulation adopted under this subtitle
shall terminate and be of no effect after July 1, [2026] 2036.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 1 –